District of Columbia statutes.
29-401.23

Notice to Attorney General.

The plaintiff in a proceeding under this part shall notify the Attorney General for the District of Columbia within 10 days after commencing the proceeding if it involves a charitable corporation. Notice to the Attorney General under this section shall not stay or otherwise affect the proceeding.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720